Nebraska, session 109, LB547.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB547 LB547
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 60-3,185, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
60-3,185 A motor vehicle tax is imposed on motor vehicles registered
for operation upon the highways of this state, except:
(1) Motor vehicles exempt from the registration fee in section
60-3,160;
(2) One motor vehicle owned and used for his or her personal
transportation by a disabled veteran or blind veteran of the United
States Armed Forces as defined in section 77-202.23 whose disability or
blindness is recognized by the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs and who was discharged or otherwise separated with a
characterization of honorable if an application for the exemption has
been approved under subsection (1) of section 60-3,189;
(3) Motor vehicles owned by Indians who are members of an Indian
tribe;
(4) Motor vehicles owned by a member of the United States Armed
Forces serving in this state in compliance with military or naval orders
or his or her spouse if such servicemember or spouse is a resident of a
state other than Nebraska;
(5) Motor vehicles owned by the state and its governmental
subdivisions and exempt as provided in subdivision (1)(a) or (b) of
section 77-202;
(6) Motor vehicles owned and used exclusively by an organization or
society qualified for a tax exemption provided in subdivision (1)(c) or
(d) of section 77-202 if an application for the exemption provided in
this subdivision has been approved under subsection (2) of section
60-3,189; and
(7) Trucks, trailers, or combinations thereof registered under
section 60-3,198.
Sec. 2. Section 77-202.23, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-2-

LB547 LB547
2025 2025
77-202.23 As used in sections 77-202.23 and 77-202.24, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Disabled veteran has the same meaning as in 5 U.S.C. 2108, as
such section existed on January 1, 2025 person shall mean a veteran who
has lost the use of or has undergone amputation of two or more
extremities or has undergone amputation of one or more extremities and
has lost the use of one or more extremities; and
(2) Blind veteran means shall mean a veteran whose sight is so
defective as to seriously limit such veteran's his ability to engage in
the ordinary vocations and activities of life.
Sec. 3. Section 77-202.24, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-202.24 A mobile home shall be exempt from taxation if it is owned
and occupied by a disabled veteran or blind veteran of the United States
Armed Forces whose disability or blindness is recognized by the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs as service connected and who was
discharged or otherwise separated with a characterization of honorable or
general (under honorable conditions).
Sec. 4. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 5. Original sections 60-3,185, 77-202.23, and 77-202.24,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-3-